Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 7

Joint Committee on Children's Services [Repealed]

3-15-701. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§3-15-701 —3-15-706 concerned the joint committee on children’s services.

3-15-702. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§3-15-701 —3-15-706 concerned the joint committee on children’s services.

3-15-703. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§3-15-701 —3-15-706 concerned the joint committee on children’s services.

3-15-704. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§3-15-701 —3-15-706 concerned the joint committee on children’s services.

3-15-705. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§3-15-701 —3-15-706 concerned the joint committee on children’s services.

3-15-706. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§3-15-701 —3-15-706 concerned the joint committee on children’s services.